Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
26-1-136.7. Opioid treatment for a person in custody - definitions.

A state department facility may make available opioid agonists and opioid antagonists to a person committed to or placed within the facility with an opioid use disorder. The facility is strongly encouraged to maintain the treatment of the person throughout the duration of the person's commitment, as medically necessary.

Qualified medication administration personnel may, in accordance with a written physician's order, administer opioid agonists and opioid antagonists pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

A state department facility may contract with community-based health providers for the implementation of this section.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Opioid agonist" means a full or partial agonist that is approved by the federal food and drug administration for the treatment of an opioid use disorder.

"Opioid antagonist" means naltrexone or any similarly acting drug that is not a controlled substance and that is approved by the federal food and drug administration for the treatment of an opioid use disorder.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1017), ch. 288, p. 1423, § 3, effective September 14.

26-1-136.8. Custody of a person with the capacity for pregnancy.

A state department facility that has in its custody a person who is capable of pregnancy shall:

Train the facility's staff to ensure that a pregnant person receives safe and respectful treatment;

Develop administrative policies to ensure a trauma-informed standard of care is integrated with current practices to promote the health and safety of a pregnant person;

Provide each pregnant person, during the person's pregnancy and through the person's postpartum period, with access to:

Perinatal health-care providers with perinatal experience; and

Healthy foods and information on nutrition, recommended activity levels, safety measures, and supplies, including menstrual products as required in section 26-1-136.5, and breast pumps approved by the executive director or the executive director's designee;

Provide counseling and treatment for pregnant people who have suffered from:

A diagnosed behavioral, mental health, or substance use disorder;

Trauma or violence, including domestic violence;

Human immunodeficiency virus;

Sexual abuse;

Pregnancy loss or infant loss; or

Chronic conditions;

Provide evidence-based pregnancy and childbirth education, parenting support, and other relevant forms of health literacy;

Develop administrative policies to identify and offer opportunities for postpartum persons to maintain contact with the person's newborn child to promote bonding, including enhanced visitation policies, access to facility nursery programs, and breastfeeding support, when appropriate;

In accordance with the requirements of the federal "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996", as amended, Pub.L. 104-191, transfer health records to community providers if a pregnant person exits the facility during the person's pregnancy or during the person's postpartum period;

Connect a person exiting the facility during the person's pregnancy or postpartum period to community-based resources, such as referrals to health-care providers, substance use disorder treatment, and social services that address social determinants of maternal health;

Establish partnerships with local public entities, private community entities, community-based organizations, Indian tribes and tribal organizations as defined in the federal "Indian Self-Determination and Education Assistance Act", 25 U.S.C. sec. 5304, as amended, or urban Indian organizations as defined in the federal "Indian Health Care Improvement Act", 25 U.S.C. sec. 1603, as amended; and

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), by February 15, 2022, and by February 15 each year thereafter, report to the judiciary committees of the senate and house of representatives, or their successor committees, on the number of births by pregnant people who are in the custody of the facility, including the location of the births, that occurred in the prior calendar year.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-193), ch. 433, p. 2865, § 9, effective September 7.

26-1-137. Persons committed to or placed in a department of human services facility - prohibition against the use of restraints on pregnant women.

As used in this section, "facility staff" means the staff of a state department facility or facility supervised by the executive director.

Facility staff, in restraining a woman who is committed to or placed pursuant to this title or title 27, C.R.S., in a state department facility or a facility supervised by the executive director, shall use the least restrictive restraint necessary to ensure safety if the facility staff have actual knowledge or a reasonable belief that the woman is pregnant. The requirement that staff use the least restrictive restraints necessary to ensure safety shall continue during postpartum recovery and transport to or from a facility.

Facility staff or medical staff shall not use restraints of any kind on a pregnant woman during labor and delivery of the child; except that staff may use restraints if:
(3) (a) (I) Facility staff or medical staff shall not use restraints of any kind on a pregnant woman during labor and delivery of the child; except that staff may use restraints if:

The medical staff determine that restraints are medically necessary for safe childbirth;

The facility staff or medical staff determine that the woman presents an immediate and serious risk of harm to herself, to other patients, or to medical staff; or

The facility staff determine that the woman poses a substantial risk of escape that cannot reasonably be reduced by the use of other existing means.

Notwithstanding any provision of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) to the contrary, under no circumstances shall staff use leg shackles or waist restraints on a pregnant woman during labor and delivery of the child, postpartum recovery while in a medical facility, or transport to or from a medical facility for childbirth.

The facility or medical staff authorizing the use of restraints on a pregnant woman during labor or delivery of the child shall make a written record of the use of restraints, which record shall include, at a minimum, the type of restraint used, the circumstances that necessitated the use of the restraint, and the length of time the restraint was used. The state department shall retain the record for a minimum of five years and shall make the record available for public inspection with individually identifying information redacted from the record unless the woman who is the subject of the record gives prior written consent for the public release of the record. The written record of the use of restraint shall not constitute a medical record under state or federal law.

After childbirth and upon return to a state department facility or a facility supervised by the executive director, the woman shall be entitled to have a member of the state department's medical staff present during any strip search.

When a woman's pregnancy is determined, the facility staff shall inform a pregnant woman committed to or placed in a state department facility or a facility supervised by the executive director in writing in a language and in a manner understandable to the woman of the provisions of this section concerning the use of restraints and the presence of medical staff during a strip search.

The executive director shall ensure that facility staff receive adequate training concerning the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-193), ch. 312, p. 1467, § 4, effective January 1, 2011.

26-1-138. Memorandum of understanding - notification of risk - rules.

On or before July 1, 2011, the department of human services and the department of education shall enter into a memorandum of understanding, pursuant to section 22-2-139, C.R.S., concerning the enrollment of students in the public school system from a state-licensed day treatment facility, facility school, or hospital licensed or certified pursuant to section 25-3-101, C.R.S.

The state board may promulgate rules pursuant to the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., concerning the implementation of the memorandum of understanding, including but not limited to rules regarding notification of and sharing of information as described in section 22-2-139, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1274), ch. 271, p. 1251, § 6, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 271, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

26-1-139. Child fatality and near fatality prevention - process - department of human services child fatality review team - reporting - rules - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

It is of the utmost importance and a community responsibility to mitigate the incidents of egregious abuse or neglect, near fatalities, or fatalities of children in the state due to abuse or neglect. Professionals from disparate disciplines share responsibilities for the safety and well-being of children as well as expertise that can promote that safety and well-being. Multidisciplinary reviews of the incidents of egregious abuse or neglect, near fatalities, or fatalities of children due to abuse or neglect can lead to a better understanding of the causes of such tragedies and, more importantly, methods of mitigating future incidents of egregious abuse or neglect, near fatalities, or fatalities.

There is a need for agency transparency and accountability to the public regarding an incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, a near fatality, or a child fatality that involves a suspicion of abuse or neglect when the child or family has had previous involvement, as defined in paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section, with the state or county within three years prior to the incident.

There is a need for a multidisciplinary team to conduct in-depth case reviews after an incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, a near fatality, or a child fatality that involves a suspicion of abuse or neglect and when the child or family has had previous involvement, as defined in paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section, within three years prior to the incident. The multidisciplinary reviews would complement that of the review conducted by the Colorado state child fatality prevention review team in the department of public health and environment pursuant to article 20.5 of title 25, C.R.S. The goal of the multidisciplinary review shall not be to affix blame, but rather to improve understanding of why the incidents of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatalities, or fatalities of a child due to abuse or neglect occur, to identify and understand where improvements can be made in the delivery of child welfare services, and to develop recommendations for mitigation of future incidents of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatalities, or fatalities of a child due to abuse or neglect.

It is the intent of the general assembly to codify the department of human services child fatality review team as well as modify certain aspects of its processes to promote an understanding of the causes of each incident of egregious abuse or neglect, near fatality, or fatality of a child due to abuse or neglect, identify systemic deficiencies in the delivery of services and supports to children and families, and recommend changes to help mitigate future incidents of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatalities, or fatalities of children due to abuse or neglect.

It is further the intent of the general assembly to comply with the federal "Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Reauthorization Act of 2010", Pub.L. 111-320, which requires states to allow for public disclosure of the findings or information about a case of child abuse or neglect that resulted in a child fatality or near fatality, and to include in the disclosure the age, gender, and race or ethnicity of the child to better understand trends and patterns of child fatalities in Colorado as they relate to age, gender, and race or ethnicity.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Incident of egregious abuse or neglect" means an incident of suspected abuse or neglect involving significant violence, torture, use of cruel restraints, or other similar, aggravated circumstances that may be further defined in rules promulgated by the state department pursuant to this section.

"Near fatality" means a case in which a physician determines that a child is in serious, critical, or life-threatening condition as the result of sickness or injury caused by suspected abuse, neglect, or maltreatment.

"Previous involvement" means a situation in which the county department has received a referral, responded to a report, opened an assessment, provided services, or opened a case in the Colorado TRAILS system that is related to the provision of child welfare services, as defined in section 26-5-101 (3).

"Suspicious fatality or near fatality" means a fatality or near fatality that is more likely than not to have been caused by abuse or neglect.

"Team" means the department of human services child fatality review team established in rules promulgated pursuant to section 26-1-111 and codified pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

There is hereby established in the state department the department of human services child fatality review team. The team shall have the following objectives:

To assess the records of each case in which a suspicious incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatality, or child fatality due to abuse or neglect occurred and the child or family had previous involvement, as defined in paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section, within three years prior to the incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatality, or fatality of a child due to abuse or neglect;

To understand the causes of the reviewed incidents of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatalities, or child fatalities;

To identify any gaps or deficiencies that may exist in the delivery of services to children and their families by public agencies that are designed to mitigate future child abuse, neglect, or death; and

To make recommendations for changes to laws, rules, and policies that will support the safe and healthy development of Colorado's children.

The team shall have the following duties:

To review the circumstances around the incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatality, or child fatality;

To review the services provided to the child, the child's family, and the perpetrator by the county department for any county with which the family has had previous involvement, as defined in paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section, within three years prior to the incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatality, or fatality of a child due to abuse or neglect;

To review records and interview individuals, as deemed necessary and not otherwise prohibited by law, involved with or having knowledge of the facts of the incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatality, or fatality of a child due to abuse or neglect, including but not limited to all other state and local agencies having previous involvement, as defined in paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section, within three years prior to the incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatality, or fatality of a child due to abuse or neglect;

To review the county department's compliance with statutes, regulations, and relevant policies and procedures that are directly related to the incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatality, or fatality;

To identify strengths and best practices of service delivery to the child and the child's family;

To identify factors that may have contributed to conditions leading to the incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatality, or fatality, including, but not limited to, lack of or unsafe housing, family and social supports, educational life, physical health, emotional and psychological health, and other safety, crisis, and cultural or ethnic issues;

To review supports and services provided to siblings, family members, and agency staff after the incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatality, or fatality;

To identify the quality and sufficiency of coordination between state and local agencies;

To develop and distribute the following reports, the content of which shall be determined by rules promulgated by the state department pursuant to subsection (7) of this section:

On or before July 1, 2014, and on or before each July 1 thereafter, an annual child fatality and near fatality review report, absent confidential information, summarizing the reviews required by subsection (5) of this section conducted by the team during the previous year. The report must also include annual policy recommendations based on the collection of reviews required by subsection (5) of this section. The recommendations must address all systems involved with children and follow up on specific system recommendations from prior reports that address the strengths and weaknesses of child protection systems in Colorado. The team shall post the annual child fatality and near fatality review report on the state department's website and distribute it to the Colorado state child fatality prevention review team established in the department of public health and environment pursuant to section 25-20.5-406, C.R.S., the governor, the health and human services committee of the senate, and the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees. The annual child fatality and near fatality review report must be prepared within existing resources.

The final confidential, case-specific review report required pursuant to subsection (5) of this section for each child fatality, near fatality, or incident of egregious abuse or neglect. The final confidential, case-specific review report shall be submitted to the Colorado state child fatality prevention review team established in the department of public health and environment pursuant to section 25-20.5-406, C.R.S.

A case-specific executive summary, absent confidential information, of each incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatality, or child fatality reviewed. The team shall post the case-specific executive summary on the state department's website.

Each county department shall report to the state department any suspicious incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatality, or fatality of a child due to abuse or neglect within twenty-four hours of becoming aware of the incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatality, or fatality of a child due to abuse or neglect. If the county department has had previous involvement, as defined in paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section, within three years prior to the incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatality, or fatality of a child due to abuse or neglect, the county department shall provide the state department with all relevant reports and documentation regarding its previous involvement with the child within sixty calendar days after becoming aware of the incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatality, or fatality of a child due to abuse or neglect. The state department may grant, at its discretion, an extension to a county department for delays outside of the county department's control regarding the receipt of all relevant reports and information critical to an effective review, including but not limited to the final autopsy and law enforcement reports, until such documents can be made available for review by the team.

Within three business days after receiving from a county department the information provided pursuant to subsection (5)(a) of this section, the department shall disclose to the public that information has been received, whether the department is conducting a review of the incident, whether the child was in the child's own home or in foster care, as defined in section 19-1-103, and the child's gender and age. The department may disclose the scope of the review.

The team shall complete its review of each incident of egregious abuse or neglect, near fatality, or fatality of a child due to abuse or neglect, draft a confidential, case-specific review report, and submit the draft report to any county department with previous involvement, as defined in paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section, within fifty-five calendar days after the review team meeting. Any county department with previous involvement, as defined in paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section, has thirty calendar days after the completion of the draft confidential, case-specific review report to review the draft confidential, case-specific review report and provide a written response to be included in the final confidential, case-specific review report. A confidential, case-specific review report must be finalized and submitted pursuant to paragraph (e) of this subsection (5) no more than thirty calendar days after the county department's response is received by the team or upon confirmation in writing from the county department that a written response will not be provided.

The proceedings, records, opinions, and deliberations of the department of human services child fatality review team shall be privileged and shall not be subject to discovery, subpoena, or introduction into evidence in any civil action in any manner that would directly or indirectly identify specific persons or cases reviewed by the state department or county department. Nothing in this paragraph (d) shall be construed to restrict or limit the right to discover or use in any civil action any evidence that is discoverable independent of the proceedings of the department of human services child fatality review team.

The team shall provide the final confidential, case-specific review report to the executive director, the director for any county or community agency referenced in the report, the county board of human services of any county department with previous involvement, as defined in subsection (2)(c) of this section, the legislative members of the team appointed pursuant to subsection (6)(f) of this section, the department of public health and environment, and the office of the child protection ombudsman pursuant to section 19-3.3-103 (1)(a)(II)(B).

The state department shall post on its website, within seven business days after the report's finalization, a case-specific executive summary of the final confidential, case-specific review report, absent confidential information as described in paragraph (i) of this subsection (5), of each incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatality, or child fatality reviewed pursuant to this section.

The case-specific executive summary for a child who was not in foster care, as defined in section 19-1-103, at the time of the fatality must include:

The child's name, date of birth, and date of fatality;

The age, gender, and race or ethnicity of the child and a description of the child's family, including the birth order of the child whose death is being reviewed;

A statement of any child welfare services, as defined in section 26-5-101 (3), and any other government assistance or services that were being provided to the child and are recorded in the state's human services case management systems, including TRAILS, the Colorado benefits management system, or the Colorado child care automated tracking system, any member of the child's family, or the person suspected of the abuse or neglect;

The date of the last contact between the agency providing any child welfare service and the child, the child's family, or the person suspected of the abuse or neglect;

The age, income level, and education level of the legal caretaker at the time of the fatality;

Information on the person or persons caring for the child at the time of the fatality; and

Any other information required by rules promulgated by the state department pursuant to subsection (7) of this section.

The case-specific executive summary for a child who was in foster care, as defined in section 19-1-103, at the time of the incident must include:

The child's name, date of birth, and date of fatality;

The age, gender, and race or ethnicity of the child;

A description of the foster care placement;

The licensing history of the foster care placement;

A statement of any child welfare services, as defined in section 26-5-101 (3), and any other government assistance or services that were being provided to the child and are recorded in the state's human services case management systems, including TRAILS, the Colorado benefits management system, or the Colorado child care automated tracking system, any member of the child's family, or the person suspected of the abuse or neglect;

The date of the last contact between the agency providing any child welfare service and the child, the child's family, or the person suspected of the abuse or neglect; and

Any other information required by rules promulgated by the state department pursuant to subsection (7) of this section.

The case-specific executive summary or other release or disclosure of information pursuant to this section shall not include:

Any information that would reveal the identity of the child who is the subject of the executive summary, any member of the child's family, any member of the child's household who is a child, or any caregiver of the child;

Any information that would reveal the identity of the person suspected of the abuse or neglect or any employee of any agency that provided child welfare services, as defined in section 26-5-101 (3), to the child or that participated in the investigation of the incident of fatality, near fatality, or egregious abuse or neglect;

Any information that would reveal the identity of a reporter or of any other person who provides information relating to the incident of fatality, near fatality, or egregious abuse or neglect;

Any information which, if disclosed, would not be in the best interests of the child who is the subject of the report, any member of the child's family, any member of the child's household who is a child, or any caregiver of the child, as determined by the state department in consultation with the county that reported the incident of fatality, near fatality, or egregious abuse or neglect and the district attorney of the county in which the incident occurred, and after balancing the interests of the child, family, household member, or caregiver in avoiding the stigma that might result from disclosure against the interest of the public in obtaining the information.

Any information for which disclosure is not authorized by state law or rule or federal law or regulation.

The state department may not release the case-specific executive summary if the state department, in consultation with the county, determines that making the executive summary available would jeopardize any of the following:

Any ongoing criminal investigation or prosecution or a defendant's right to a fair trial; or

Any ongoing or future civil investigation or proceeding or the fairness of such proceeding.

If at any point in the review process it is determined that the incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatality, or fatality is not the result of abuse or neglect, the review shall cease.

The state department or any county department may release to the public any information at any time to correct any inaccurate information reported in the news media, so long as the information released by the state department or county department is not explicitly in conflict with federal law, is not contrary to the best interest of the child who is the subject of the report, or his or her siblings, is in the public's best interest, and is consistent with the federal "Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Reauthorization Act of 2010", Pub.L. 111-320.

The team consists of up to twenty members, appointed on or before September 30, 2011, as follows:

Three members from the state department, appointed by the executive director;

Two members from the department of public health and environment, appointed by the executive director of said department;

Three members representing county departments, appointed by a statewide organization representing county commissioners;

At least eight additional multidisciplinary members, to be appointed by the members described in paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection (6), including but not limited to representatives from the office of the child protection ombudsman and from the fields of child protection, physical medicine, mental health, education, law enforcement, district attorneys, child advocacy, and any others as deemed appropriate;

For the purposes of participating in a specific case review, additional members may be appointed at the discretion of the members described in paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection (6) to represent agencies involved with the child or the child's family in the twelve months prior to the incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, a near fatality, or fatality; and

Two members of the general assembly, one appointed by the majority leader of the senate and one appointed by the majority leader of the house of representatives; except that, if the majority leaders are from the same political party, the minority leader of the house of representatives shall appoint the second member. The members appointed pursuant to this paragraph (f) are nonvoting members and are not required to be present at any meeting of the team.

(6.5) Members of the team serve three-year terms and are eligible for reappointment upon the expiration of the terms. Vacancies shall be filled in a manner and within a time frame to be determined by rules promulgated by the state department pursuant to subsection (7) of this section; except that any vacancy of a member appointed pursuant to paragraph (f) of subsection (6) of this section shall be filled by the appointing authority.

(6.7) The members of the team appointed pursuant to paragraph (f) of subsection (6) of this section are entitled to receive compensation and reimbursement of expenses as provided in section 2-2-326, C.R.S.

The state department shall promulgate additional rules, as necessary, for the implementation of this section, including but not limited to the confidentiality of information in incidents of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, near fatalities, or child fatalities.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1181), ch. 120, p. 375, § 1, effective April 20.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (SB 12-033), ch. 91, p. 295, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2013:

(1), (2)(c), (3)(a), (4)(b), (4)(c), (4)(i)(I), (5)(a), (5)(b), (5)(c), (5)(e), (5)(l), and (6)(f) amended, (6.5) added, and (5)(g) and (5)(h) R&RE, (SB 13-255), ch. 222, pp. 1037, 1042, §§ 10, 11, effective May 14.

L. 2014:

(6.7) added, (SB 14-153), ch. 390, p. 1965, § 25, effective June 6.

L. 2021:

(5)(e) amended, (HB 21-1272), ch. 324, p. 1987, § 4, effective June 24; (5)(b), IP(5)(g), and IP(5)(h) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 747, § 124, effective October 1.

26-1-140. State exception to HIPAA - significant threat to schools - legislative declaration - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1063), ch. 176, p. 607, § 2, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective December 31, 2017. (See L. 2016, p. 607.)

26-1-141. Departments - report required - hepatitis and HIV tests - definitions.

On or before December 31, 2019, the executive directors of the department of human services, the department of health care policy and financing, and the department of corrections shall submit a report to the public health care and human services committee and the health and insurance committee of the house of representatives and the health and human services committee of the senate concerning:

The amount of federal funds that each department is eligible to receive or is currently receiving that may be used for testing for hepatitis B, hepatitis C, or HIV;

The number of individuals currently being tested for each disease listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section; and

Whether each department is planning to increase the number of people being tested for each disease listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

The departments specified in subsection (1) of this section shall prepare materials describing the eligibility standards currently in use for treatment of hepatitis B, hepatitis C, and HIV and distribute materials to primary care providers in the state. The departments may distribute the materials by providing the materials to the relevant professional association for the providers, at professional association meetings and conferences, or by other appropriate means as determined by each department.

As used in this section:

"Arranging for the provision" means demonstrating established referral relationships with health-care providers for any of the comprehensive primary care services not directly provided by an entity.

"Primary care" means the basic entry-level health care provided by physician or nonphysician health-care practitioners that is generally provided in an outpatient setting.

"Primary care" includes:

Providing or arranging for the provision of primary health care;

Maternity care, including prenatal care;

Preventive, developmental, and diagnostic services for infants and children;

Adult preventive services;

Diagnostic laboratory and radiology services;

Emergency care for minor trauma;

Pharmaceutical services; and

Coordination and follow-up for hospital care.

"Primary care" may also include optional services based on a patient's needs.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-228), ch. 276, p. 2603, § 8, effective May 23.

26-1-142. Veteran suicide prevention pilot program - rules - report - definitions - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-129), ch. 296, p. 1760, § 1, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

Entire section repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1518, § 82, effective July 1.